Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5692.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 45-24 of the General Laws entitled "Zoning Ordinances" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-24-37.1. Home-based businesses.
Notwithstanding any zoning or other municipal ordinance to the contrary, any individual
operating a home-based business which meets the criteria provided by the Internal Revenue Code
for a home office tax deduction, may operate without securing any approvals from their
municipality; provided, that the home-based business does not store chemicals, other hazardous
materials, or park heavy equipment on the premises, and not more than ten percent (10%) of the
premises are used for parking in connection with the operation of the home-based business.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001733
========